Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-418
Standards; incentives.

The division shall develop and adopt technical and operational standards for any communication system acquired, developed, constructed, or replaced by any state agency or any city, county, village, public power district, fire protection district, or other political subdivision, including joint entities and joint public agencies created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or Joint Public Agency Act. The division shall develop incentives to encourage regional cooperation in public safety communication throughout the state. The division shall assist local communities and public safety agencies which desire to connect with a network of regional communication systems. Incentive alternatives may include financial incentives to encourage migration by communities to the network and to reward communities which coordinate efforts to form public safety communication centers. Such incentives shall not mandate migration by public safety agencies to the network.

Laws 1999, LB 446, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1809;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 218;

Laws 2005, LB 343, § 7.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.